Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Joint or Mutual Wills

53-4-30.
Contract concerning succession.

A contract made on or after January 1, 1998, that obligates an individual to make a will or a testamentary disposition, not to revoke a will or a testamentary disposition, or to die intestate shall be express and shall be in a writing that is signed by the obligor.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 7.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “January 1, 1998,” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section”.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-4-31.
Definitions.

A joint will is one will signed by two or more testators that deals with the distribution of the property of each testator. A joint will may be probated as each testator’s will.

Mutual wills are separate wills of two or more testators that make reciprocal dispositions of each testator’s property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment on Webb v. Smith,

220 Ga. 809

,

141 S.E.2d 899

(1965), see
2 Ga. St. B.J. 258 (1965).

For article advocating restructuring or repeal of former Code 1933, § 113-104, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

53-4-32.
Effect of execution.

The execution of a joint will or of mutual wills does not create a presumption of a contract not to revoke the will or wills.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-33.
Revocation.

A joint will or mutual wills may be revoked by any testator in the same manner as any other will.

Revocation of a joint will or a mutual will by one of the testators shall not revoke the will of any other testator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment on Webb v. Smith,

220 Ga. 809

,

141 S.E.2d 899

(1965), see
2 Ga. St. B.J. 258 (1965).

For article advocating restructuring or repeal of former Code 1933, § 113-104, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).